Massachusetts, session 194th, H817.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
An important part of the political institutions, of our society, and our Commonwealth, are
enabled by the creation of political parties, and designations, to provide a vehicle for citizens to
engage in organized political actions, to facilitate the recruitment, and candidacy of individuals
for office; and to provide mechanisms for developing organized political positions, and
platforms.
Under the Massachusetts Constitution, the Massachusetts General Laws, and appropriate
regulations, flowing from these legal authorities, political parties, are described, and can be
of 2

established, to enjoy, and access certain legal mechanisms, providing choices to all eligible, and
registered voters of The Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
While political parties, and designations, have elements of private, and/or semi-private
organizations, they also have public, and semi-public elements, and aspects, and so are in
important ways, hybrid organizations.
Although it is true, that political parties, have elements that have conventionally been
regarded as semi-private, they perform in a public arena, and have elements of direct influence,
in terms of government, and public policy that influence the residents of various electoral
districts, and The Commonwealth of Massachusetts, as a whole.
SECTION 2. – It is in the public interest, and has long been established, that an Office of
Campaign and Political Finance (OCPF) shall exist, to collect, to report, and to make available,
the various sources of contributions, the expenditure of gathered resources; and to monitor,
develop, and enforce appropriate legal requirements regarding such matters; in regards to
candidates for elections.
The evolution of these standards, has been in the direction of efficiency, effectiveness,
and public knowledge, which assist broad public purposes of transparency, and understanding.
Therefore, this statute defines certain political party offices, such as candidates for state
committee members; town committees, ward committees, and city committees, at elections,
which are printed on the public ballot, at regular intervals, to be offices, for which such
candidates, are required to report all contributions, and all expenditures, relating to campaigns
for these offices, according to the reasonable regulations that are established, and may be
additionally established, by the Office of Campaign and Political Finance (OCPF).
of 2